 Currently, we have mice four months old that used to be diabetic and are no longer diabetic.
 The research is still in its early stages, as Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor in the faculty of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and director of the clinical and scientific Department of the Canadian Association of Diabetes, will indicate.
 Like other specialists, he is sceptical about whether diabetes can be cured and he points out that these discoveries are not relevant to those who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Nobel Committee for Literature of the Academy of Sweden, publicly declared on Sveriges radio that, since the committee had been unable to contact Bob Dylan directly to communicate the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature, the committee had abandoned its efforts to communicate with him.
 Danius declared, “Currently, we are not doing anything. I called and sent Emails to his closest assistant and received very cordial replies. For the moment, that is undoubtedly enough.
 Prior to this, Ring's executive director, Jamie Siminoff, mentioned that the company had initiated a lawsuit after the doorbell of their store in their garage could not be heard.
 He said he built a wifi Timbre.
 Siminoff declared that sales shot up after his appearance on an episode of Shark Tank in the year 2013, in which the television show's panel refused to fund the company's launch.
 Toward the end of 2017, Siminoff made an appearance on the television shopping channel QVC.
 Ring also reached a settlement in the litigation with the security company, ADT Corporation.
 To date, no drug has been shown to science to be adequate to treat the existing infection caused by Ebola, although there is an experimental vaccine that appears to be able to decrease the mortality caused by that disease.
 Zmapp, a combination of antibodies, had a promising early field study, but formal studies showed it was less beneficial than expected to prevent death.
 In the PALM trial, the function of Zmapp was control, meaning that the scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 USA Gymnastics supports the United States Olympic Committee's statement and recognizes that it is imperative that the Olympic family foster a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC's statement that the interests of athletes, clubs and their sports can be better served if we advance with significant changes within our organization, rather than withdrawing certifications.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that can shed light on how the abuse of the proportion that Larry Nassa survivors have described with such courage could have gone on for so long and accepted any necessary and appropriate change.
 The goal of USA Gymnastics and USOC is the same: to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for athletes to pursue their dreams in a protected, positive and empowered environment.
 During the 60s, Brzezinski worked for John F. Kennedy as an advisor and, later, for the government of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy in the 1976 elections, and later worked as the assistant to the national security advisor, or ASN, between 1977 and 1981, following Henry Kissinger.
 As national security advisor, he assisted Carter in the diplomatic handling of international affairs, such as the Camp David Accords of 1978, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution of 1979, which led to a hostage crisis in Iran, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Tyan Gosling and Emma Stone, was nominated in all the most important categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress, respectively.
 Among the other nominations are best picture, best director, best cinematography, best costume design, best editing, best original score, best production design, best editing, best sound mixing and best original screenplay.
 Two were nominated for best original song: Audition and City of Stars. The studio Lionsgate was nominated 26 times, more than any other studio.
 On Sunday night, in a statement made through the press Secretary, the President of the United States of America, Donald Trump, communicated that the U S . troops would withdraw from Syria.
 The announcement came after the telephone conversation Trump had with the President of Turkey, Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also assume the surveillance of ISIS militants captured, whom European nations, as the communique indicates, denied their repatriation.
 Besides confirming that at least some dinosaurs were feathered, a theory already generalized, it also offers specific data that fossils generally do not offer, such as their color and three-dimensional structure.
 According to specialists, this animal has a plumage of chestnut color in the upper zone and a palish or carotenoid tonality in the lower part.
 The finding also allows us to better understand the evolution of bird feathers.
 Given that dinosaur feathers do not have a well-developed rachis, but do present other features of feathers (barbs and barbules), researchers have concluded that it is likely that the rachis is the result of an evolutionary development of these other features.
 The structure that presents the plumage suggests that its function was not related to flight, but that it used them to regulate the temperature or as an indicator of the same. The researchers maintain that, although it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample analyzed presents features of the plumage of an adult and not of a chick.
 The experts' appraisals were that, although it is the tail of a dinosaur of short age, the sample illustrates more the plumage of an adult than that of a chick.
 In the morning yesterday, in Gaziantep, Turkey, a car bomb killed two police officers and injured more than twenty others.
 Nineteen of the injured were police officers, the government said.
 The police informed that the suspect for the attack is a Daish militant.
 It was discovered that the sun was governed by the same basic principles as other stars: the only factors that drove its activity within the system were its luminosity and its rotation.
 The intensity of light and rotation are combined to calculate the Rossby number of a star, linked to plasma flow.
 At a lower number of Rossby, the activity of the star is less in relation to its magnetic inversions.
 Iwasaki debuted in the North Atlantic campaign of World War II.
 Pirates assaulted him, a dog bit him with rabies in Tibet, he escaped marriage in Nepal, and the police stopped him in India.
 The 802.11n standard works on both 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequencies.
 This will make it possible for compatibility with earlier versions of 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, as long as the base station has dual radios.
 The speeds of the 802.11n standard are much higher than those achieved by its predecessors, with a theoretical maximum throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, who is married and has two adult children, did not make a good impression on Miller, who was the one who told him the story.
 When Miller asked for a comment, Miller said,
 We will work hard to reduce the level of carbon dioxide emitted per unit of GDP by 2020, so that the difference will be significant compared with 2005, Hu said.
 No mention was made of a figure for the cuts and he said they would be based on China's economic output.
 Hu incentivized developing states to not return to the traditional path of first contaminating and then cleaning up.
 Still, it is not correct to demand that they assume obligations that exceed their phase of development, their level of responsibility and their capacities.
 The Iraq Study Group released its report at 12:00 GMT.
 Warned that no one can give guarantees that any Iraqi action at this point will stop sectarian fighting, growing violence or a slide toward chaos.
 The report begins with a call for open debate and a consensus in the United States about Middle East policies.
 The report is extremely critical of virtually every aspect of the executive power's policy in Iraq, and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 It contains 78 recommendations, of which number one is the adoption of a new initiative before the end of the year with the purpose of protecting Iraq's borders from hostile operations and to restore diplomatic ties with its neighbors.
 Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, who at the time was a senator and first lady of Argentina, announced last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires, that she would run for the Presidency.
 The Teatro Argentino was the place where Mrs Kirchner announced her intention to run for President, this is the same place where she started her campaign for the Senate in the year 2005, representing the province of Buenos Aires.
 The issue that gave rise to the debate was the controversy over the budget allocated to the relief and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives labeled the Bush New Orleans Agreement.
 Criticisms of the liberals in relation to the works of restoration have their focus on the fact that contracts for reconstruction have been awarded to persons who, apparently, are functionaries of Washington.
 More than four million individuals concentrated in Rome to witness the funeral.
 It was so much the amount of people that concentrated, that not all could access the funeral in St . Peter's square.
 Television screens were set up in different parts of Rome so that everyone could watch the ceremony.
 In many other Italian cities, as well as all over the world, in particular in Poland, similar montages were carried out, which saw many, many people.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies for concentrating its resources on easy cases, especially car thefts, with the intention of improving its success rate.
 In the fiscal year 2005, Congress began funding the campaign against obscenity and gave the instruction that the FBI must assign 10 agents to occupy themselves with adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest in entries: 70 not outs with only 41 balls, connecting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The performance of both Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, was good and they achieved a century partnership.
 Mas, later on, without the captain's wicket, India only managed 36 runs and 7 of their wickets were bowled out to finish the overs.
 The first mandatary of the U.S., George W. Bush, arrived in Singapore early on November 16, beginning a seven-day tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's vice-prime minister, Wong Kan Seng, and debated commercial and terrorism issues with the head of state, Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of midterm election defeats, Bush gave a speech to the audience about commercial expansion in the Asian continent.
 Stephen Harper, Prime Minister, agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee where all parties participate before second reading, and after the 25-minute meeting in the PMO on Tuesday with Jack Layton, leader of the NDP.
 During the meeting held with the Prime Minister, Layton had requested that changes be introduced to the Conservatives' environmental law, appealing to a 'thorough and complete modification of its wording'.
 Since the Federal Government intervened and assumed the funding of the Mersey hospital in Davenport, Tasmania, state authorities and some members of the Federal Parliament have called the move a stunt, with an eye to the Federal Elections, which are due in November.
 However, Prime Minister John Howard stated that the only purpose of the law was to protect the hospital's installations from degradation by the Tasmanian government, by giving it an additional A$45 million.
 According to the latest report, sea level readings indicate the formation of a tsunami and some activity of this phenomenon was detected in the vicinity of Pago Pago and Niue.
 No major damage or injuries have been reported in Tonga, but power was temporarily disrupted, which is supposed to have frustrated the Tongan authorities' receipt of the tsunami warning issued by the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools in the coast of Hawaii or in the area near it closed completely Wednesday, despite the warnings being lifted.
 George W . Bush, President of the United States, received the announcement with glee.
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for Bush, referred to the North Korean commitment as a major step forward toward the goal of achieving verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 Today, a storm originated in the Atlantic Ocean, the tenth storm of its hurricane season, was named Subtropical Storm Jerry.
 The National Hurricane Center said that for now, Jerry is expected to touch land.
 According to estimates by the Corps of Engineers, up to 6 inches of rain could seep through the previously damaged dikes.
 Due to the overflow of the dike that is near the Ninth District, the water reaches up to the waist currently in that place, which had already suffered inundations of up to 20 feet because of hurricane Katrina.
 The water flows over the dike in a stretch that has a width of 100 feet.
 Adam Cuerden, administrator of Commons, expressed his frustration over the deletions in a statement he made to Wikinwes last month.
 In essence, Wales lied from the beginning, pretending that he was doing it for legal reasons, while faking that he was paying us attention until the moment he eliminated the artistic content.
 The enmity of the community led to the current efforts to draft a policy on the sexual content of the site, which hosts millions of media with open licenses.
 While this was an eminently theoretical work, the program was drafted with the finality of simulating the observations made to the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 It would be the forces of mirage between the dark matter present in the Galaxy and that of the Milky way that would cause the effect expected by the group of scientists.
 The Milky Way influences the Sagittarius Galaxy in the same way that the moon exerts a force of attraction on our planet and causes the tides.
 The experts concluded that dark matter affects itself in the same way that regular matter does.
 This theory holds that most of the dark matter surrounding a galaxy is in a class of halo and consists of numerous small particles.
 In television coverage, white smoke can be seen emanating from the plant.
 The local government warns those who live near the plant not to leave their homes, keep air conditioners off and not to consume water from the tap.
 According to Japan's nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine have been found in the plant.
 According to speculations by the authorities, everything indicates that the containers of the place that have uranium fuel could have broken and have leaks.
 Extremely drug resistant tuberculosis, or XDR-TB, was first detected by Dr Tony Moll in a South African area of Zululandia.
 During an interview, he said the new variant was generating a lot of concern and alarm, given its high mortality rate.
 The doctor Moll believes that some patients could have contracted the virus inside the hospital and that at least two of the infected were health workers of that hospital.
 In a year, an infected person can contagious to between 10 and 15 people with whom he has had close contact.
 Nevertheless, the percentage of XDR-TB in the total group of TB patients still seems to be low: 6000 out of a total of 333 000 individuals infected at a particular moment in South Africa.
 The satellites, whose weight exceeded 1,000 pounds and which traveled at nearly 17,500 miles per hour, collided 491 miles above the earth.
 According to experts, the explosion that generated the collision was massive.
 They're still trying to establish how important it was and how it will affect the planet.
 The U S . strategic command, which depends on the office of the Department of Defense, is conducting a search of the remains.
 The result of the tracking analysis will be made available on a free access Website.
 Authorities in Ohio said a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated homicide after his mother's body was found in the trunk of his car Wednesday.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb located about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the side of the road, wearing a T-shirt and underwear, and in apparent state of overmedication.
 He guided the officers to his black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There they discovered the corpse of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, covered with blood-stained blankets.
 The police said the corpse appeared to have been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease during this season were reported in late July.
 Pigs are the carriers of the disease, which then migrates to humans via mosquitoes.
 The outbreak has led the authorities in India to adopt measures such as deploying pig hunters, distributing thousands of mosquito nets to the population and using pesticides in the worst-affected areas.
 The authorities have also guaranteed several million vials of the vaccine to fight encephalitis, which will allow sanitary companies to prepare for next year.
 This year, the scarcity of monetary resources and the low priority, compared with other diseases, have caused delays in the execution of the plans of delivery of the vaccine in the historically most vulnerable regions.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where, after three years, he got a job in the Swedish post office and there became Chief engraver.
 The amount of stamps he made, both for Sweden and for 28 other nations, exceeds one thousand units.
 The quality and level of detail of his work are so recognized that he has become one of the few “household names” among philatelists, with people specializing in collecting his work.
 Included in the Guinness book of world records, his one thousandth stamp was the formidable Hazañas memorables de los reyes suecos (David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, year 2000).
 He also had a part in the engraving of bills for many States, the most recent examples of his labor being the portraits of the Prime Minister visible on the reverse of the new Canadian five and one hundred dollar bills.
 After the accident, Gibson was transported to a hospital, but he died shortly after.
 The driver of the truck, a 64-year-old, emerged unscathed from the accident.
 They removed the vehicle from the scene of the accident around 12:00 GMT the same day.
 An employee of a garage near the scene of the accident said,
 All rushed back from the scene of the accident.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali are saving the forests that subsist on the planet and sharing technologies to help developing nations grow in less contaminating ways.
 The UN intends to complete a fund of assistance in favor of the countries victim of the effects of global warming, in order to be able to face its impact.
 Money could be used to fund homes not inundable, better water management and diversification of crops.
 Fluke wrote that efforts by some to silence women who speak about the health of these did not prosper.
 This was based on the large number of positive and encouraging comments from women and men urging that contraceptive medicines be considered as a health need.
 Once the fighting had ceased, after the wounded were taken to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining prisoners remained in the yard, resisting going to their cells.
 Although negotiators tried to compose the situation, the demands of the prisoners are confusing.
 The inmates set fire to the prison yard between 10:00 and 11:00 p.m. MDT.
 Rapidly, agents armed with anti-riot equipment entered the yard and beat down the inmates with tear gas.
 The firefighters managed to extinguish the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 With the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal flooding that left sediments along the river was stopped.
 This sediment was necessary for the formation of beaches and playas, which, in turn, functioned as habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species of fish have been extinguished and two others are in danger of extinction, among them the gila cypha.
 Although the water level will only rise a few feet past the inundation, authorities expect it to reach to recompense the deteriorated banks of sand downriver.
 No tsunami alert was issued nor will be issued, according to the geophysical agency of Yakarta, the earthquake did not reach the magnitude of 6.5 required for such a purpose.
 Even though there was no threat of a tsunami, residents began to panic and leave their businesses and their homes.
 While Winfrey cried in her farewell, she clarified to her fans that she would return.
 This will not be a farewell, it's just the end of one chapter and the beginning of another.
 The comfortable re-election of the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was confirmed by the final results of Namibia's parliamentary and presidential elections.
 The party in power, the South West Africa People's Organisation (SWAPO), also won the majority of votes in the legislative elections.
 The coalition and Afghan troops moved to the region to secure the place and other coalition aircraft have been sent to assist them.
 The accident took place on high ground in the mountains and is thought to have been caused by hostile fire.
 Efforts to find the place of the accident must deal with bad weather and the rough terrain.
 The Mangola Association, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organisation call it the worst outbreak recorded in the country.
 The spokesman for Medecines Sans Frontiere, Richard Veerman, commented, Angola is heading towards the most severe outbreak it has ever faced and the situation continues to be very grave.
 The start of the games was at 10:00 a.m., accompanied by good weather, and, except for a light rain at mid-morning that soon dissipated, was an ideal day for Rugby 7.
 South Africa, the tournament's top seed, began well by obtaining a comfortable 26-0 win against Zambia, who are in fifth place.
 Although they showed up against their Southern sisters, South Africa improved as the tournament went on.
 Their disciplined defense, their ball handling skills and the excellent teamwork led them to stand out and it was clear that this was the team to defeat.
 Authorities in Amsterdam and the Ana Frank Museum say a fungus has infected the tree and that it is dangerous to public health because it is in imminent danger of falling.
 His logging was scheduled for Tuesday, but was saved after an emergency court ruling.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, known as the Seven Sisters, is at least 100 m to 250 m (328 to 820 feet).
 As the infrared images emerge, the temperature variations during the night and day indicate that probably caves are involved.
 During the day, its temperature is lower than that of the surface around it, and at night, higher.
 While its thermal behavior is not as regular as the great caves on our planet, which usually sustain a fairly stable temperature, it is consistent with these deep cavities in the ground,
 In France, elections have traditionally been a low-tech experience: voters seal themselves in a booth and insert in a pre-printed envelope the name of the candidate they have chosen.
 After officials verify the identity of the person who presents himself to vote, he or she inserts the envelope into the urn and signs the list of voters.
 The French electoral law establishes the procedures quite strictly.
 Since 1988, the urns have to be transparent, allowing voters and observers to verify that no extra ballots are added at the beginning of the vote and that no others are added that are not those of the voters, duly counted and authorized.
 Candidates have the faculty to send representatives to control each stage of the process and, during the night, volunteers count the votes under a rigorous supervision and according to specific procedures.
 ASUS Eee PC, which previously was launched globally for its cost-saving and functionality, became the subject of heated debates at the Taipei 2007 Information Technology Month.
 But the market for consumers of portable computers versified drastically and changed after ASUS received from the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China the Award for Sustainable Development of Taiwan 2007.
 The station's Website describes the show as, quote,
 In its inception, the program was only broadcast on the Internet radio site, TogiNet Radio, a long-time space focused on the format of spoken radio.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet installed AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary.
 Originally, the show featured amateur voice actors from the East Texas area.
 It was reported that the widespread looting extended throughout the night, given that there was no police presence in the streets of Bishkek.
 An observer described Bishkek as if it were sinking into a state of anarchy as groups of people wandered the streets and looted shops selling consumer goods.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the protesters in the South for the unrest.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks of New Zealand in a Rugby match of the three nations, at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score indicated a one point win, 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' 15-match winning streak.
 In the case of the Springboks, it meant overcoming a run of five consecutive losses.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final of the series will be played at Ellis Park, Johannesburg, next week, in a clash between the Springboks and Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook the West of Montana at 10:08 p.m. on Monday.
 Neither the U S . Geological Survey nor its National Seismic Information Center has reported damage directly.
 The epicenter of the quake was located nearly 20 km (15 mi) northeast of Dillon and almost 65 km (40 mi) south of Butte.
 They confirmed that the strain of avian flu that kills humans, H5N1, attacked a wild duck that died, found Monday in a pond near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is in seventh place among the European Union members victims of the virus, behind Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 So far, no cases of H5N5 have been confirmed in Croatia and Denmark.
 Chambers's claim against God was founded on the death, destruction and terror of millions and millions of people on the planet.
 Chambers, agnostic, alleges that his claim has no merit and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story that Camille Saint-Saens's French opera tells is that of an artist whose life is prescribed by love, drugs and Japan.
 As a consequence, artists smoke cannabis cigarettes on stage and the show encourages the audience to do the same.
 The ex-Speaker of the House, Newt Gingrich, the governor of Texas, Rick Perry, and Michele Bachmann, a member of Congress, occupied the fourth, fifth, and sixth positions, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but launched harsh words against Rommey, in whose representation negative campaign ads against Gingrich in Iowa were broadcast.
 Perry said, I would evaluate the results of today's election and determine if there is a path I should follow.
 Bachmann, who had won the Straw Poll at Ames in August, decided to end his campaign.
 The photographer was taken to Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 According to reports, he was in his twenty s. Bieber stated in a statement, "[While] I was not present nor directly involved in this terrible accident, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family.
 According to entertainment news TMZ, the photographer stopped the vehicle on the Sepulveda Boulevard sidewalk and attempted to take photographs of the police stop before crossing the street and continuing, which caused the California patrol officer to give the vehicle two times the order to return to the sidewalk.
 According to police authorities, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will be prosecuted.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, there are several countries that have not managed to reach the podium of medals.
 Including the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen, who yesterday obtained the ninth place in the women's category in the Super-G, and Finland, with Katjia Saarinen in the tenth place in the same event.
 Mitchell Gourley, of Australia, placed eleventh in the men's slalom super giant slalom category, while the Czech competitor, Oldrich Jelinek, finished sixteenth in the men's sitting group.
 Arly Velásquez, of Mexico, obtained the fifteenth position in the men's Super-G, while Adam Hall, of New Zealand, finished in ninth place in the men's Super-G.
 The male visually impaired skier, Maciej Krezel, and his guide, Anna Ogarzynska, of Poland, finished in thirteenth place in the Super-G. Jong Seork Park of South Korea earned the twenty fourth place in the male sitting group.
 After the earthquake in 2010, UN peace forces arrived in Haiti and are blamed for spreading the disease, since the first cases were registered in the vicinity of their troops' camp.
 According to the demand, the UN camp's waste was not sanitized correctly, causing the bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's most caudalous rivers.
 Prior to the arrival of peacekeeping forces, Haiti had not faced problems associated with the disease since the nineteenth century.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti has mentioned the existence of independent trials that point to the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion as the involuntary introducer of the disease to Haiti.
 According to Danielle Lantagne, a specialist in the disease who works for the UN, it's likely the outbreak was caused by the peace forces.
 Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital admitted the patient and that his condition was stable.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where there were some cases of Ebola.
 The hospital has respected the infection control protocol, including distancing the patient from others to prevent possible infections.
 Previously, Simon had held several jobs in other television shows, in various positions.
 In the 80s, she lent her collaboration in several programs, for example, Taxi, Cheers and The Tracy Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he helped with the creation of The Simpsons, with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for the first team of writers for the series.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars in royalties season after season.
 Previously, China's news agency, Xinhua, had reported the hijacking of an airplane.
 According to subsequent reports, the aircraft received a bomb threat and was diverted back toward Afghanistan, where it landed in Kandahar.
 Preliminary reports indicate the aircraft was diverted back to Afghanistan after it was denied authorization to make an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air accidents are common in Iran, which has an old fleet that receives poor maintenance, whether for civilian or military operations.
 Sanctions imposed at international level have translated into the impossibility of acquiring new aircraft.
 Three people died and three others were injured in a police helicopter accident earlier this week.
 Last month, Iran experienced one of its worst air disasters in years when a passenger plane heading to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 passengers on board.
 The same month, another passenger plane overshot a runway in Mashhad and collided with a wall, leaving 17 dead.
 Aerosmith canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band had scheduled a tour of the U S . and Canada that would end on September 16.
 The reason for the cancellation of the tour was the injury that Steven Tyler suffered when he fell off the stage during one of their performances on August 5.
 After both players held all the services of the set, Murray lost the first by sudden death.
 While Del Potro held an initial advantage in the second set, this too was subject to a tiebreak after reaching the 6-6.
 At that point in the match, Del Potro had to receive treatment on his shoulder, but he managed to return to the game.
 The program began at 8:30 p.m. local time (15:00 UTC).
 Recognized national singers interpreted bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 Sanju Sharma, the singer, inaugurated the event and was followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also sang the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan, along with Raju Khandelwal.
 After that, Lakkha Singh passed to the front to sing the bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was honored with 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog, which in Hindu religion, consists of 56 distinct edibles, like sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, among others, that are served as an offering to the god.
 Besides, Lakkha Singh interpreted the chhappan bhog bhajan along with the singer Raju Khandekwak.
 On Thursday, at the Tokyo Game Show, Satoru Iwata, president of Nintendo, unveiled the design of the controller for the new Nintendo Revolution Console.
 In a manner similar to what occurs with a remote control of television, this control is provided with two sensors located near the television of the user, enabling the triangulation of his position in a three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games through the movement of the device through the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella was unable to maintain control of the vehicle and abandoned the race shortly after the start.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, had the lead for most of the race, but had to put him just after his pit stop, surely due to the fact that his right tire was seriously bent.
 Michael Schumacher abandoned the race shortly after Alonso, due to a suspension failure, product of the numerous battles during the race.
 According to a transcript of the press conference, he said, she was very beautiful and, in addition, she sang quite well.
 Every time we did a rehearsal of this, it moved me from the very depths of my soul.
 Approximately 3 minutes after takeoff, a camera inside showed numerous pieces of insulating foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 In any case, it is believed that they have not caused any damage to the shuttle.
 Wayne Hale Jr, the head of NASA's shuttle program, said the foam had fallen off the tank in a way that was not a concern.
 Five minutes after the start of the show, a wind that, approximately a minute later, had reached 70 kilometres per hour, then came the rain, but so strong and so dense that it pierced your skin like a needle. Then, great hailstones fell from the sky, and people, terrified, screamed and ran over others.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and, on my return, I saw two people in wheelchairs and the others jumping over them and pushing them.
 In addition, NHK indicated that the Kashiwazaki-Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co declared that the earthquake did not cause incidents and that reactors 1 and 2 of its Shika nuclear plant were shut down.
 Around 9,400 homes in the region are reported to be without water and around 100 without electricity.
 Some routes were damaged, train service was disrupted in the affected areas, and Noto airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb was detonated at the door of the governor general's office.
 Three other bombs were detonated in the vicinity of government establishments in a two-hour span.
 While there are reports that the official number of dead is eight and the authorities have confirmed that nearly 30 people were injured, the official figures are still unknown.
 Concentrations of cyanuric acid and melamine were found in urine samples analysed from animals that died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The researchers indicated that the two compounds react with each other to give rise to crystals that can obstruct kidney function.
 Specialists detected the formation of crystals in the urine of cats, due to the incorporation of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 being compared through the use of infrared spectroscopy, it could be determined that the composition of the crystals coincides with that found in the urine of affected pets.
 I do not know if you have noticed or not, but most of the products coming from Central America arrived to this country free of taxes.
 Even so, the countries of Central America have imposed tariffs on eighty percent of the products we make.
 I was moved every time we did a rehearsal on this, from the bottom of my heart.
 The only thing I say to the people is that you treat us the same way you treat us.
 A proposed law was dictated by the governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, that would not allow the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The bill requires violent video games sold in the state of California to be labeled with a sticker that reads, quote,
 The director of the Prosecution, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning informing that Huhne and Pryce would be taken to trial.
 Huhne has resigned, and Ed Davey MP will replace him in the cabinet, Norman Lamb MP is expected to take over the business minister role that Davey leaves vacant.
 The date on which Huhne and Pryce are scheduled to appear before the Westminster Magistrates' Court is the 16th of February.
 Nicholas Alden and Zachary Cuddeback, 25 and 21 years old, respectively, died. Alden was driving.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered wounds in the arm and in the jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required facial reconstruction surgery.
 Uka's weapon jammed while aiming at the head of a fifth man. Schneider suffers permanent pain, cannot see with one of his eyes, lacks a part of his skull, and his face had to be reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider testified via a virtual link from a base of the United States Air Force in his home country.
 Carpanedo participated in two individual races apart from the Wednesday competition.
 The first was the slalom, in which he obtained a «No Terminó la primera carrera», along with 36 of the 116 participants of that race.
 In her other race, the giant slalom, she obtained the tenth place in the women's group of sentadas with a combined time of execution of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 minutes behind the first finalist, Claudia Loesch, of Austria, and 1:09.02 minutes below the ninth finalist, Gyöngyi Dani, of Hungary.
 Four skiers in the category sitting failed to complete their runs and a total of 45 participants out of 117 in the Slalom Gigante failed to reach the classification in the race.
 The Madhya Pradesh police force was able to recover the stolen laptop and cell phone.
 The assistant Inspector General, D.K. Arya, declared, we have arrested five individuals who abused the Swiss woman and recovered her mobile phone and laptop computer.
 Baba, Bhutha, Rampro, Gaza and Vishnu Kanjar are the imputed.
 According to the superintendent of police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused presented themselves before the court with their faces covered.
 Despite the fact that there were three people inside the house at the time of the car's impact, none of them suffered injuries.
 Nevertheless, the driver suffered serious injuries to his head.
 The road where the accident took place was temporarily closed while emergency services pulled the driver of the red Audi TT from the wreckage.
 At first, he was transferred to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 Then he was transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Since then, Adekoya has been in the Edimburgh sheriff court accused of the murder of her son.
 While she is in custody awaiting the accusation and trial, any statement by an eyewitness can be questionable, since her image has been widely disseminated.
 It's a common practice in other regions of the UK, but as Scottish justice works in a different way, the courts considered the publication of photographs as potentially prejudicial.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee said, quote,
 The office of the crown, which handles the proceedings, told reporters that no additional comments would be made at least until the auto of proceedings is issued.
 According to the information that leaked, the document will treat about the border conflict, which Palestine pretende to resolve based on the limits vigorous in form previos to the war of the Middle East of 1967.
 Other topics that were also addressed, according to the report, include the future status of Jerusalem, which both nations consider sacred, and the problem of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a military presence in the valley for ten years once the agreement is signed, while PA only accepts five.
 During the pest control supplementary test, the game wardens had to supervise the shooters closely, since this was monitored and evaluated for effectiveness.
 In a partnership between NPWS and the New South Wales Association of Deer Shooters Inc, volunteers within the Association's Deer Shooters program were recruited.
 Mick O'Flynn, who is in charge, provisorily, of the conservation and heritage office of the NPWS, said that an integral training in safety and training was given to the four shooters chosen for the shooting operation.
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a new nine-member Provisional Electoral Council.
 In four years, it's the fifth CEP of Martelly.
 Last month, a presidential commission advised that the previous CEP resign, as part of a series of measures aimed at bringing the country to new elections.
 The Commission was the form in which Martelly responded to the widespread demonstrations that began in October against the regime.
 The demonstrations, at times violent, were provoked by the fact that no elections have been held, in some cases since 2011.
 Nearly 60 cases of iPods with problems of functioning and exesive heating, which originated six incendios and provoked minor burns to four people.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry of Japan reported 27 accidents involving these devices.
 Last week, METI announced that apple had informed them of 34 additional incidents of overheating, which the company catalogued as not serious.
 The Ministry also issued a statement regarding the delay in the report from Apple, saying it was something that was truly lamentable.
 Mariana was shaken by a quake at 7:19 h local time (21:19 h GMT) on Friday.
 The Marianas Islands Emergency Management Agency indicated that there were no reports of damage in the United States territory.
 At the same time, the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center reported the absence of tsunami indicators.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former police agent seized a bus and held hostage tourists who were coming from Hong Kong.
 Rolando Mendoza opened fire with his M16 against the foreign visitors.
 Several hostages have been rescued and, so far, at least six have been confirmed dead.
 Both the six hostages, among them children and the elderly, and the Filipino photographers were released early.
 Later, photographers occupied the place of an old woman because she needed to go to the bathroom, Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed the same path as his father and began studying medicine.
 She received training in obstetrics and began working for the National Women's hospital in Auckland around 1959.
 Liggins began her research into premature birth in her spare time, while working at the hospital.
 His study showed that fetal lung maturation of the baby could be sped up through the administration of a hormone.
 Xinhua reported Wednesday that government investigators had recovered the flight recorders from the black box.
 The fighters companions of Luna also paid him tribute.
 Tommy Dreamer said, Luna was the first queen of the Extreme. She died the night of the two moons, something unique, like her.
 Dustin Oro en Polvo Runnels declared, «Luna was as rare as me, even more so. I love and Miss her. I hope she's in a better place.»
 Since 2008, among the 1,400 people surveyed prior to the 2010 Federal Election, there was an 8% growth in those opposed to Australia becoming a Republic.
 Julia Gillard, the then Prime Minister, stated during the 2010 Federal election campaign that she considered Australia should become a republic once the term of Queen Elizabeth II had ended.
 Thirty four percent of those surveyed share this view and want Isabel II to be the last queen that Australia has.
 At one end of the survey, 29% of people considered Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible, at the other, 31% thought it should never do so.
 The Olympic gold medallist had to swim the 100 and 200 metres freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth games, but his physical condition has been questioned after his complaints.
 No medicines have been allowed to ease the pain, because they are banned from use in the Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and professor of computer science at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest prime number known.
 Many people verified the finding using various types of hardware and software and by early February and it was made public on Tuesday.
 Comets may have served as a source of water for our planet, as well as organic matter, which has the capacity to form proteins and sustain life.
 The expectation of scientists is to understand how planets originate, in particular ours, given that comets crashed into the earth long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, assumed as governor at the beginning of the year and last month, he signed a bill that allows people of the same sex to marry.
 He called the rumors, political gossip and booberies.
 He is speculated to run for the Presidential elections in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that, according to the Federal Aviation Administration, would reduce the distances of air routes, which would save millions of gallons of fuel per year, as well as carbon emissions.
 It employs satellite technology, in contrast to the old terrestrial radar technology, in order to enable air traffic controllers to detect aircraft with greater precision and to provide pilots with more accurate data.
 No additional transportation will be implemented and trains will not stop at Wembley. Parking for automobiles and dissuasion will not be available.
 Due to the preoccupation generated by the possible lack of transportation, the possibility of the game being played behind closed doors, without the fans of the team, was considered.
 On Thursday, the magazine Science reported on the discovery of a new species of bird in the Ecuadorian Galapagos Islands.
 Experts from the University of Princeton, in the U S, and from Uppsala, in Sweden, revealed that the new species evolved in just two generations, even though it was estimated that it would take much longer, because of reproduction between an endemic Darwin finch, Geospiza fortes, and a migratory cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can take all kinds of forms and curl into tiny figures.
 Not only can it be hammered and rolled into sheets, but it can also be stretched to a very fine wire that can be twisted and braided.
 It can be made very thin and adhered to another metal. It is so thin that it used to be used to decorate illustrations made by hand in books called illuminated manuscripts.
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make a pH indicator using red cabbage juice.
 The color of the cabbage juice will be altered depending on how acid or basic the chemical substance is.
 The number of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) present in the chemical analyzed determines its pH level.
 Hydrogen atoms are formed by a proton and an electron, so a hydrogen ion is the result of stripping a proton of its electron.
 Agitate both dry powders together, and after doing so, with hands hygienized and moist, Express them to form a ball.
 There will be a reaction between the moisture in your hands and the outer layers, which will feel strange to the touch and form a sort of Shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had flush toilets in almost every house, which connected to a sophisticated drainage system.
 In some Minoan households of Crete and Santorini, Greece, vestiges of sewer systems were found.
 Toilets also existed in ancient Egypt, Persia and China. In the Roman civilization, public baths had toilets and some were shared by men and women.
 When one communicates with someone who is thousands of miles away, one is using a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then, almost instantly, reflects it back.
 The satellite was sent into space via a rocket, scientists use telescopes in space, given that the light from the atmosphere of Terra distorts part of the light and view we have.
 It takes a giant rocket, more than 100 feet tall, to be able to carry a satellite or telescope out into space.
 The wheel has modified the world in surprising ways. The most relevant thing it has done for us was to provide us with a much simpler and faster transportation.
 Thanks to it, today we have many means of transport, such as the railway or the automobile, among many others.
 Below, there are smaller cats that feed on medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small Felidae (including independent domestic cats) that feed on species of much smaller size that exist in much greater quantity, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of niche: each feline has a particular function, which prevents it from competing with others.
 Lions are the most social of cats and live in large groups called prides.
 The herds are formed by one to three adult males of the same family group, united with up to thirty females and their offspring.
 Generally, females relate closely to each other, making them a large family of sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides have the same behaviour as wolves or dogs, with whom they share a surprising similarity (unlike other big cats) in both their conduct and in that they are highly lethal to their prey.
 Atleta integral, the tiger has the ability to climb, swim, jump, and pull five times more than a robust person.
 Tigers are in the same genus (Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars, the only four felines capable of roaring.
 The tiger's roar is not a fully sonorous roar like the lion's, but rather, as a prayer of words said to grunts and to the screams.
 Ocelots enjoy feeding on small creatures, preferably monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds, almost all of which will be much smaller than themselves.
 Scientists believe that ocelots track and find animals to eat through their sense of smell, by smelling the ground where they have passed.
 They have very good night vision and in dark places, and in addition, they move very silently. Ocelots hunt their prey by mimicking their surroundings and then they leap upon them.
 When a small group of living things (a small population) separates from the main one from which they came,
 The new environment counts with different resources and competitors and therefore a new population will need different characteristics or adaptations than it had before to be a strong competitor.
 No changes have occurred in the original population, which still need the same adaptations as in the past.
 Over time, as the incipient population begins to adapt to the new environment, it begins to resemble the other population less and less.
 Finally, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different that it will not be possible to catalogue them as the same species.
 This process receives the name of speciation, which simply means the development of new species, and is an ineludible consequence and a fundamental part of evolution.
 Plants generate the oxygen that people breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that they exhale (that they exude).
 The food of plants is generated with solar energy, thanks to photosynthesis, and they also offer us shade.
 We build our houses from plants and with them we also make clothing, most of the food we eat is plants, without them animals would not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was the Alpha predator of its era, therefore, nothing feared it, except other Mosasaurs of its own species.
 Its long jaws had more than 70 teeth, sharpened like knives, plus another group of teeth in the palate, which meant that anything that passed in front of it had no escape.
 We have no certainty, but it could have had viperine, its diet including turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and even could have been a cannibal.
 It also attacked any creature that entered the water: not even a dinosaur as huge as the T. Rex was a threat to it.
 While most of that food would be familiar to us, Romans also ate certain unconventional items at banquets, like wild boars, peacocks, snails, and even a type of rodent, the lirion.
 Another thing that differentiated them was that the humble people and women ate sitting in a chair, while the wealthy enjoyed sharing banquets and throwing themselves sideways while eating.
 It is not possible that recipes from ancient Rome included foods that arrived in Europe from America or Asia centuries later.
 Verbigracia, no had maize, nor tomatoes, nor potatoes, nor cacao, and no Roman of the antique degustated a pavo any time.
 Babylonians built for each of their gods a central temple considered their home.
 People carried sacrifices to the gods and priests sought to satisfy the needs of those by performing ceremonies and festivals.
 Temples have an open courtyard and then a inner sanctuary to which only priests could enter.
 In some cases, special towers in the form of pyramids, called ziggurats, were built to form part of the temples.
 The upper part of the tower constituted a special sanctuary for their deity.
 In the middle of the hot climate of the Middle East, the house was of no major importance.
 The Hebrew families spent most of their time outdoors.
 Women cooked in the patio, the shops were just showcases that gave onto the street, and the houses were built of stone.
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Very few inhabitants lived in Greenland. According to the Norse Sagas, Erik the Red was exiled from Iceland for homicide and, during a voyage he embarked on further west, discovered the island and gave it its name.
 Even so, without prejudice to their discovery, the Eskimo tribes were already inhabiting the place at that time.
 While each country separately was Scandinavian, there were marked differences in relation to the people, monarchs, habits, and history between Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think a map to a treasure was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 No, though the reverse of the document contains something written, it is not a map of a treasure.
 The Declaration of Independence has the phrase, written on its reverse, Declaration of Independence original of the fourth of July, seventeen seventy six.
 Although it is not known for certain who wrote it, it is known that the enormous document of parchment, measuring 29¾ inches by 24½ inches, was rolled up for safekeeping.
 Therefore, it is probable that the annotation was added only as a label.
 While the landings carried out during D-Day, as well as subsequent engagements, had achieved the liberation of northern France, the south side still remained.
 Their government was in the hands of the French of Vichy, who were a group that in 1940 had agreed to peace with the Germans and were working with the invaders instead of fighting against them.
 On August 15, 1940, the so-called Dragoon operation was launched, through which the Allies invaded the South of France.
 In just two weeks, American and Free French forces had liberated the South of France and were heading towards Germany.
 You can define a civilization as a specific culture of which a large group of people live and work together, that is, a society.
 The term civilization derives from the Latin civilis, which means civil, and is related both to the word civis, of the same language, which means citizen, and to civitas, which means city or city state, and which, besides, determines in some way the size of the society.
 The state cities are the precursors of nations, a culture of civilization entails a long generational transmission of knowledge, a durable cultural legacy, and a homogeneous propagation.
 Minority cultures usually disappear without leaving relevant historical traces, and fail to be recognized as civilizations proper.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen states formed, at first, a weak central government under the Articles of Confederation, in which Congress was its only component.
 Congress had no power to levy taxes, and since there was a national executive or judicial power, such power was vested in the authorities of the States, who frequently did not cooperate to enforce all their laws.
 Nor was he facultied to annul laws fiscal or arancles between States.
 The articles demanded the unanimous approval of all the states to proceed to their amendment, and the States gave so little importance to the central government that their representatives used to absent themselves.
 The Italian national football team, along with Germany, is the second team with the most victories in the world and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Sports that are most practiced are football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, and Formula 1 racing.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern areas, with athletes participating in international tournaments and Olympic events.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 Islands, the largest of which is Honshu, making it the seventh largest archipelago in the world.
 Due to the conglomerate/group of Islands it contains, Japan is commonly referred to as an Archipelago, from a geographic point of view.
 Taiwan's history dates back to the fifteenth century, when sailors from Europe who were navigating the place registered the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, that is, beautiful Island.
 The establishment, in 1624, by the Dutch East India company, of a base in the South-Western Taiwanese, gave inception to a transformation in the aboriginal method of grain production, with the employment of Chinese labour to work on their rice and sugar plantations.
 The Qing dynasty Army (1644-1912) took control of the northern and western coastal region of Taiwan in 1683 and declared it a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after being defeated during the First Sino-Japanese War, the Qing government adheres to the Shimonoseki Treaty, through which it cedes sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, who conserves its control over the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu counts with three capital constructions: Intihuatana, the temple of the sun and the temple of the three windows.
 Most of the buildings in the extremes of the complex have been reconstructed so that tourists can visualize how they originally looked.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had already been restored, and work continues today.
 To exemplify, the most common format of still photography globally is the 35 mm, which was the most used film size towards the end of the analogue film era.
 Today it's still produced, but most importantly, its dimensional relationship was transferred to the image sensor formats of Digital cameras.
 In fact, the 35 mm format is somewhat confusing, since its measurements are 36 mm wide by 24 mm high.
 It is said that the dimensional ratio of this format (dividing by twelve to calculate the simplest ratio of integers) is equivalent to 3:2.
 Many typical formats (e.g., the group of formats APS) are equal or very similar to this aspect ratio.
 The rule of thirds, which has been the subject of constant jokes and many times ridiculed, is a simple rule that generates dynamism while allowing some order to the images.
 Indicates that the most effective position where to place the central object is the intersection that is formed between the horizontal and vertical lines that divide the image into thirds (see example).
 During this phase of Europe's history, the Catholic Church, which had amassed wealth and power, was questioned.
 For more than a millennium, Christianity had united the European states, despite their different languages and customs.
 His power, present everywhere, affected all, from the monarch to the plebeian.
 One of the most important principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the funds of the church are reserved for that specific function.
 The central dome of the church had stood in Rome for more than a millennium and this concentration of power and money made many wonder if this principle was being respected.
 Soon after hostilities began, the British began a naval blockade of Germany.
 While the strategy, which involved the interruption of vital military and civilian supplies, was successful, the measure violated generally recognized international law and was contemplated in several international agreements of the last two centuries.
 Britain extracted international waters in complete sectors of the ocean to block the ingress of ships, even putting at risk neutral vessels.
 Having received a reduced response against this tactic, Germany thought it would find a similar reaction to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 Throughout the decade of the nineteen twenty s, the attitude adopted by the majority of the citizens and of the nations was that of pacifism and isolation.
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, countries wanted to avoid such a situation from happening in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to take a job at Edison's company in New York.
 He arrived in the U S. with 4 cents, a book of poems, and a recommendation letter from Charles Batchelor, his manager at his last job, to Thomas Edison.
 China had a unique way of delimiting the different periods of time. Each stage or each family in power constituted a different dynasty.
 Between each dynasty, there was also a period of instability, with provinces divided. The most well-known was the Three Kingdoms period, which developed over 60 years, between the Han and the Jin dynasties.
 During these stages, a bloody war erupted between many nobles who disputed the throne.
 One of the bloodiest periods in the history of ancient China was the Three Kingdoms period, where thousands of people died in a struggle to occupy the throne of the great Palace in Xi'An.
 There are many political and social consequences, such as the use of the metric system, the shift from absolutism to Republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people, not to a single sovereign.
 Asimismo, luego de la Revolución, los puestos estuvieron abiertos a todos los candidatos masculinos, lo que permitió el éxito de los más ambiciosos y prestigiosos.
 The same thing happens with the military, since instead of basing the ranks of the Army on classes, now they are based on caliber.
 The French Revolution was also a source of inspiration for many other repressed working-class people of other countries to take up their own revolutions.
 Mahomet was deeply interested in questions beyond this worldly life, and used to visit a cave known as Hira on the mountain of Noor,
 The cave itself, which endured in time, illustrates very realistically the spiritual inclinations of Muhammad.
 At the summit of one of the mountains north of Mecca, a cave lies totally abstracted from the rest of the planet.
 In fact, it is very difficult to find, even if one were sure of its existence.
 Nothing can be seen more than the wonderful clear sky and the numerous mountains of the surroundings. From the interior of this cave, one can see or hear very little of this world.
 Of the seven wonders, the only one that still stands is the great pyramid of Giza.
 The great pyramid, built by the Egyptian people in the third century BC, is one of many structures of pyramidal shape and great size constructed to venerate the fallen Pharaoh.
 The great majority of Hong Kong Island's urban development is densely packed on reclaimed land along the northern shore.
 The great pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Khufu, and many other smaller tombs and temples were built in honor of his wives and family.
 The up arrow mark looks like a V and the down arrow mark looks like a grap or a square without its bottom edge.
 Arriba means to start at the tip and push the bow, and abajo means to start at the rana, where the hand holds the bow and pulls it.
 The upward movement of the arc generates a softer sound, whereas a downward movement is louder and sharper.
 Feel free to make your own marks with pencil, but do not forget that the marks on the bow instruments have been impressed in that place for a musical purpose and therefore should be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, a mob of market women forced the terrified monarch, Louis XVI, to Marie Antoinette, her two small children (Marie Therese, eleven years old, and Louis Charles, four years old), and the King's sister, Madam Elizabeth, to return to Paris from Versailles.
 They traveled back to Paris in a carriage surrounded by a mob shouting and throwing threats at the King and Queen.
 The crowd forced the King and the Queen to open completely the windows of their carriage.
 At one point, a participant in the revolt shook the head of a Royal guard executed in Versailles in front of the queen, who was in panic.
 The Filipino people themselves paid the war expenses of U.S. imperialism in the conquest of the Philippines.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial regime with the purpose of Solvencing the major part of the bonds' interest and fees that fluctuated in the name of the Philippine government in the banks of Wall Street.
 Since then, the super gains derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people would constitute the principal gains of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, it is necessary to understand the context that gave rise to the order.
 The European historical period in which these events took place is commonly known as the High Middle Ages, between the eleventh, twelfth and thirteenth centuries, that is, between the years 1000 and 1300.
 The early Middle Ages were preceded by the early Middle Ages and followed by the late Middle Ages, which, by convention, ends around the year 1500.
 Technological determinism is a concept that comprises, pragmatically, a wide range of ideas, from the impulse or technological imperative to a strict sense of that there is a subjacent logic that drives the destiny of humanity and that relates to the laws of science and how they are embodied in technology.
 Almost all interpretations of technological determinism have in common two general ideas: that technological development in itself unfolds along a path independent of any cultural or political influence, and that, at the same time, technology has effects on societies that are inherent and not socially conditioned.
 To give an example, one might argue that the existence of automobiles necessarily derives in the development of highways.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for a reduced volume of automobiles, so new manufacturing techniques are being designed to reduce the costs of owning a vehicle.
 The mass use of automobiles also generates a greater incidence in traffic accidents, which leads to the development of new techniques in the field of health to repair damaged bodies.
 The element of cultural determinism was very present in the romanticism, according to scholars like Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the context of Romanticism, geography molded the people and, over time, developed customs and cultures related to that geography that, when in harmony with the location of that society, were preferable to laws that were imposed arbitrarily.
 As well as Paris is known as the city of fashion today, Constantinople was considered as such in feudal Europe.
 Its fame as a center of luxury began approximately in 400 BC and extended until approximately 1100 BC.
 During the twelfth century, their status decayed, especially because, on their return, the crusaders brought gifts, such as silks and spices, which were valued more than the goods offered in Byzantine markets.
 The title of capital of fashion was transferred, from then on, from Constantinople to Paris.
 The cusp of the Gothic style took place in the period between the X-XI and the XIV centuries.
 At first, the way of dressing received great influence from Byzantine culture in the East.
 Nevertheless, due to the slowness of communication channels, Western styles could carry a delay of about 25 to 30 years.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop a style of its own. One of the most significant advances of that time was that, as a result of the Crusades, people began to use buttons to fasten their garments.
 Subsistence agriculture is understood to be that which aims to produce sufficient food to meet the needs of the farmer and his family group.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, generally organic, practice that combines the use of seed stocks originating from the ecological region with crop rotation or other comparatively simple methods to maximize production.
 Historically, much of the principal activity of farmers was subsistence agriculture, which is still practiced in many developing countries.
 Subcultures congregate individuals with similar ideas and feelings of marginalization by social standards and provide them with the possibility to generate a sense of identity.
 There are many factors that can distinguish subcultures: age, ethnicity, class, location or gender of their members.
 The Internet combines elements of both mass and interpersonal communication.
 It is frequent that members of a subculture exhibit traits of their belonging to this recurring to distinctive and symbolic use of style, such as fashions, gestures, and jargon.
 One of the most commonly used mechanisms to graph the importance of socializing is to analyze the few and lamentable cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune or intentional abuse, were not socialized by adults during their growth.
 These children are called wild children, some wild children are confined by people, generally their parents, in some cases, the rejection of the parents to the grave intellectual or physical disability that the child has.
 It is possible that the wild children suffered traumatic situations or severe child abuse before being abandoned or running away.
 Some were said to have been raised by animals and some to have lived on their own in the wild.
 When the wild child is raised exclusively by animals other than humans, he presents behaviors (within his physical possibilities) almost entirely the same as those of the specific animal that cared for him, as well as his fear or indifference toward people.
 Although project-based learning should facilitate that process and make it more interesting, the scaffolding goes a little bit further.
 The scaffolding is not a learning technique, it is, rather, an assistance that provides support to those who are experiencing a new experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 The scaffolding can present itself in real or virtual form, to say it another way, a teacher is a type of scaffolding, but so is the little animated Microsoft office subjectapapeles.
 Virtual scaffolds are incorporated into the software and their function is to question, stimulate or explain procedures that may have been complex for the student to do on his or her own.
 It embraces children in guardianship homes for a wide variety of reasons, from neglect to abuse and even extortion.
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment where there is no love, care and education.
 We can perceive that the family host system provides a safe environment for these children.
 The goal of our foster care system is to offer safe homes, loving Tutors, sustained education and reliable medical assistance.
 The goal of foster care is to meet all the needs that were not being met in the home from which they were removed previously.
 Internet unites and mixes components of mass communication and between people.
 The various features that the Internet presents open up new dimensions from the perspective of the concept of uses and rewards.
 For example, learning and socialization are cited as significant incentives for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 During a study of user reactions to Websites conducted by Eighmey and McCord (1998), personal participation and long-term relationships were also detected as new motivational factors.
 Through the recording of videos, important findings have been made in the interpretation of microexpressions, which are movements in the face of only a few milliseconds duration.
 Specifically, it is claimed that through the adequate reading of their microexpressions, it is possible to detect if a person is lying.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article The President's Speech, explained the way in which those who cannot understand speech because of brain damage can, nevertheless, evaluate sincerity with precision.
 Even suggests that the skills to interpret human behaviour can be shared with animals, like domestic dogs.
 Through the work of research in the twentieth century, it has been demonstrated that there are two groups of genetic variation: the hidden and the manifest.
 The process of mutation incorporates a new genetic variation, the process of selection removes it from that set of variations.
 Segregation and recombination shuffle the variation between one generation and the next.
 On the savannah, it's not easy for a primate, whose digestive system is the same as ours, to satisfy its amino acid needs with the vegetable resources available.
 More than that, not doing it carries serious problems: slowed growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 Proteins present in leaves and legumes would have constituted the source of vegetable resources of more simple access, but are not easily digestible for primates like us, except that they are cooked.
 On the other hand, foods derived from animals (ants, termites, eggs) are easy to digest while providing a large number of proteins that contain all the essential amino acids.
 In the end, it should not cause us surprise if our own predecessors resolved their own protein problems in the same way that chimpanzees do in the savannah today.
 The interruption of sleep consists in waking up intentionally during the normal period of sleep and falling asleep again after a while (10 to 60 minutes).
 This can be easily achieved with a more or less gentle alarm clock that wakes you up again, although without completely waking you up.
 The registration is an additional requirement for the visa process. In some countries, you will have to register your presence and the address of your accommodation with the local authorities.
 Other options based on biological rhythm consist in drinking much liquid (especially water or tea, known diuretic) before going to bed, which will force him to get up to urinate.
 The level of inner peace a person enjoys is related in an opposite manner to the amount of tension that is in his body and in his spirit.
 The lower the tension, the more positive the force of life with which we count. Each of us has the potential to find absolute peace and happiness.
 All of us can reach enlightenment. The only thing that obstructs the way is our tension and negativity.
 While the Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of Buddha, it extended through the Mahayana path of love and numerous techniques of yoga from India.
 In general, laism is very simple. It is based on Kundalini yoga, meditation and the Path of love that encompasses all.
 In Kundalini Yoga, the Kundalini energy is activated with yoga positions, breathing practices, Mantras or visualizations.
 Tibetan meditation centers on Devata Yoga, through visualization of various deities, can obstruct the energy channels, activate the chakras, and develop the consciousness of enlightenment.
 Cooperation between the USSR and the USA was the result of facing a common enemy, Germany, during World War II. After the war, systemic, process, and culture clashes ended up distancing the two countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, those who were allies now were enemies, and the cold war began.
 This would extend for the next 40 years and be fought through substitute armies, in battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba, among many other places.
 Due to the fact that by September 17, 1939, Polish defense was already broken, their only hope was to retreat and reorganize in the extension of the Romanian bridgehead.
 Nevertheless, these plans fell into disuse almost overnight when more than 800,000 combatants of the Red Army of the Soviet Union invaded and formed the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after invading the Eastern regions of Poland, infringing the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other bilateral and multilateral agreements.
 Utilizing ships to transport goods is a much more efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 Since always, the function of the navy has been to guarantee that its country preserve the faculty to transport its population and merchandise, at the same time interfering with the enemy's capacity to do the same.
 The North Atlantic campaign in World War II offers one of the clearest and most recent examples of this. The United States was trying to move men and materials across the Atlantic Ocean to support Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy, employing mainly submarines, attempted to nullify this circulation.
 If the Allies had not succeeded, Germany could have taken power in Britain, just as it had in the other European countries.
 It seems that goats were first domesticated, some 10,000 years ago, in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 In order to obtain easily their milk, hair, flesh and skin, the ancient peoples and tribes began to stay with them.
 Generally, domestic goats were gathered in herds that wandered over hills or other grazing areas, frequently cared for by goat herders who were often children or adolescents, similar to the more popular shepherd.
 In England, the train tracks had already been installed by the sixteenth century.
 Even though the rails of the cars were made of simple parallel boards of wood, they allowed the horses that pulled them to achieve a greater speed and to drag heavier loads than on the roads a little more rough of the day.
 The incorporation of durmientes to keep the rails in place occurred quite early, however, gradually, it was realized that the rails would be more efficient if they were coated with iron on their upper part.
 This became a habitual practice, although the iron caused a greater wear in the wooden wheels of the wagons, made of wood.
 Eventually, wooden wheels were replaced with others made of iron, and in 1767, rails of solid iron began to be used.
 The first form of transportation that was known was walking. The human being began to do it in an upright position two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus, which means upright man.
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecus, did not have the habit of walking erect.
 Although footprints have been found in Australopithecus fossils dating from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, it is possible that Sahelanthropus walked on two legs 7 million years ago.
 We can start to live a life more friendly to the planet, form part of environmental movements or even become activists and fight to ameliorate, in some way, the suffering of the future.
 In many cases, it's like the Asymptomatic treatment, but if we're not just looking for a temporary situation, we should find the root of the problems and try to deactivate them.
 It is manifest that the world has suffered great changes, product of the technological and scientific advances of humanity, and the problems have intensified because of the super population and the extravagant lifestyle of the people.
 After it was approved by Congress on July 4, a handwritten draft, signed by the President of Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson, was sent to the printing press of John Dunlap, a few blocks away.
 During the night, between 150 and 200 copies were made, which are now known as the Dunlap copies.
 It was John Nixon who read the document for the first time and did so in the patio of the hall of independence on July 8.
 On July 6, a copy was sent to George Washington, who ordered it to be read to his Army in New York on July 9. On August 10, another copy arrived in London.
 The 25 photographs of Dunlap, which are known to still exist, are the oldest copies of the document.
 A large number of paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and still live today, the birds.
 Many people do not represent them as dinosaurs, since they have feathers and can fly.
 There are many characteristics in birds that still resemble dinosaurs.
 They have scales and claws, lay eggs, and move on their hind legs just like T-Rex.
 Currently, almost all computers function based on the manipulation of data Encoded under the Binary system.
 A Binary number can only have one of two values, they are the 0 and the 1, and according to the jargon of the computer, these numbers are known as Binary digits, or bits.
 Internal poisoning may not be evidenced immediately, its symptoms, such as vomiting, are too common to be able to give an immediate diagnosis.
 The most clear indicator of internal poisoning may be found with an open bottle of medicines or chemical cleaning products.
 Read the label to learn specific information about first aid for that specific poison.
 Entomologists employ the term insect parasite in a formal sense to refer to this group of arthropods.
 The word comes from its ancient relation with the bedbug, a species very developed to parasitize humans.
 Bed bugs and assassin bugs are nidicolous, meaning they are adapted to live in the nest or home of their host.
 Cases of multiple sclerosis in the United States are estimated to be around 400,000, making it the most common neurological disease among young and middle-aged adults.
 The central nervous system, the union of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve, is the object of attack of multiple sclerosis.
 Studies indicated that women have twice the chance of men of developing MS.
 A couple might conclude that raising a baby would not be the most convenient for them or for the child.
 These couples could choose to plan the adoption of a baby.
 In adoption, biological parents renounce their parental rights so that a different couple can raise the child.
 The capital aim of science is to decipher the way in which the world functions through the scientific method, in fact, this method serves as a guide for most scientific investigations.
 No, it's not an experiment, it's a test that's used to discard one or more of the possible hypotheses, by asking questions and making observations that guide scientific research.
 The focus of both naturalists and philosophers was placed on the classical works, especially in the Latin version of the Biblical text.
 Aristotle's thoughts, especially the questions of science, even psychology, were accepted.
 As the dominance of the Greek language was decaying, Western Europe distanced itself from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Often, many rhythms present in physiological processes and in behavior depend decisively on internal cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not only reactions to regular external stimuli, have been recorded in almost all living things, even in bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks oscillate autonomously and have a free cyclical period of operation, even if there are no external stimuli.
 One of the key indicators that DNA consisted of a genetic material was the experiment conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase inserted their own DNA into a bacteria using phage, or virus.
 They performed two experiments in which they marked the DNA of the phage with radioactive phosphorus or the protein of the DNA with radioactive sulphur.
 Depending on the type of mutation, the significance of the piece of genetic material involved and whether it involves germ cells, the mutation can have various effects.
 Only mutations in germ cells can be transmitted to children, while those that occur in other parts can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism usually attracts people interested in visiting natural areas to enjoy the landscape, which includes animal and plant life.
 Some examples of possible activities in the place are: hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching and visit to parks, and study of information of the ecosystem.
 An example is visiting, taking photographs and learning about orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people abandon small towns in their automobiles to go to their jobs and they usually cross with others whose jobs are in the place they have just left.
 In this dynamic transportation launcher, everyone is somehow connected to a system of transportation based on the use of private automobiles, and they sustain it.
 Currently, scientists maintain that this massive carbon economy has deprived the biosphere of one of its regular states that has contributed to the evolution of humanity over the last two million years.
 All are part of society and make use of transportation systems, and almost all complain about them.
 In developed countries, it is seldom heard that levels of complaint about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges are similar.
 Why do transport systems give rise to complaints of such a calibre and why do failures occur daily? are transport engineers simply incapable or is there something more substantial going on?
 The flow of traffic is the study of the individual movement of drivers and vehicles between two points and of the interactions between them.
 Unfortunately, it is not a simple task to study the flow of traffic, since it is not possible to make exact predictions about the behavior of drivers.
 Fortunately, there is a tendency in drivers to maintain a relatively consistent behavior, which allows traffic flows to have a logical consistency and can be the subject of approximate mathematical representation.
 In order to graphically illustrate the flow of circulation, relationships were established between the three most important elements: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) velocity.
 These relationships facilitate both the planning and design as well as the operations of the vial devices.
 The first species to fly were insects, which helped them to evade their enemies more easily and to find food and mates more effectively.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold the wings back, attaching them to the sides of the body.
 This provides them with a wider range of possible small places to hide from predators.
 Currently, anisoptera and Ephemeroptera are the only insects incapable of folding their wings.
 Millennia ago, a man named Aristarchus commented that the solar system rotated around the sun.
 There were those who shared his theory, but many others believed the opposite: that the solar system orbited the earth, even the sun and other stars.
 This seems to make sense, since on the earth, it's not perceived to be moving, right?
 The Amazon River is the largest and second largest river in the world, containing eight times more water than the river that comes in second.
 Besides, the Amazon is the widest river on the planet, in some points with an amplitude of up to six miles.
 Of the total water flowing from the world's rivers into the oceans, twenty percent derives from the Amazon.
 The great Amazon River has an extent of 6,387 km (3,980 miles) and receives water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 While stone pyramids continued to be built until the end of the Old Kingdom, never could it surpass those of Giza, neither in size nor in the sublime technique of their building.
 The ancient Egyptian people of the New Kingdom were amazed at the monuments of their ancestors, which at that time dated back more than a thousand years.
 With approximately 800 inhabitants, Vatican City is the smallest independent country in the world and the smallest by population.
 Italian is used in the Vatican, both for drafting its normative and for issuing its official communications.
 The language spoken daily by the majority of those who work within the state is also Italian, and the use of Latin is generally reserved for religious ceremonies.
 The total number of citizens living in Vatican City adheres to the Roman Catholic religion.
 Chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper have been known since antiquity, since all of them can be found in nature in their original form and are relatively easy to extract with rudimentary tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle developed the theory that everything is formed from a combination of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air and fire.
 This guarded greater similarity with the states of matter (with identical order): solid, liquid, gaseous and plasma, only that, at the same time, he had the theory of that they transform into new substances that conform the things that we see.
 Alloys are basically a combination of two or more metals. Remember, the periodic table has many elements.
 Metals are considered to be elements like calcium and potassium, and there are metals like gold and silver.
 It is also possible that alloys with small amounts of elements, such as carbon, that are not metallic, exist.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter, composed of tiny particles called atoms.
 The size of atoms is so immeasurably tiny that the final point of this sentence could contain billions of them.
 When it was invented, the pencil won many friends.
 Unfortunately, as a result of new writing methods, the pencil is used less and has lost its status.
 Today, people write messages on the screens of their computers, they do not even need to approach a typewriter.
 Soon, the keyboard will only be a memory of something more.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that energy is required to form a nucleus with a large number of protons and neutrons.
 It's similar to what happens when you roll a heavy car up a hill, by splitting the core once more, it releases some of that energy.
 The nuclei of some atoms are unstable, meaning that they tend to break down with a minimum or almost no push.
 The surface of the moon is composed of rocks and dust and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust has a thickness of about 70 km on the near side and 100 km on the far side.
 It is thinner under the lunar seas and thicker under the highlands.
 It is possible that there are more seas on the nearby side due to its thinner crust, which facilitated lava to rise to the surface.
 Theories of content focus on what is attractive or pleasing to the people.
 These doctrines hold that people have certain needs or desires that have been internalized as they grew to maturity.
 These theories analyze what causes certain people to want the things they do and what factors in their environment compel or oblige them to do or not do certain things.
 Two theories of very well-known are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Hertzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, there are two types of behavior when managers begin to lead their former peers. On one side of the spectrum is the attempt to continue being one of the guys.
 It's hard for managers of this category to make decisions that fall badly on employees, to impose disciplinary measures, to evaluate performance, to assign responsibilities and to demand accountability from the personnel.
 At the other extreme, he mutates into an irreconcilable person who believes it necessary to modify everything that has come before and to do it his way.
 In the end, the leader is ultimately responsible for the team's success and failure.
 This form of behavior often ends up distancing the leaders from the other members of the team.
 The same standards of excellence that guide conventional teams apply to virtual teams, although there are small differences.
 Often, members of a virtual team operate as a point of contact for their closest physical group.
 They generally enjoy greater autonomy than the members of a traditional group, thanks to the fact that it is possible for their teams to meet according to different time zones that, for example, could not be comprehended by the local management.
 The existence of a real invisible team constitutes also an exclusive element of the virtual teams.
 The invisible team is the group in charge of the management and to which each member reports. It is the one that sets the standards for each member.
 What motive could an organization have for subjecting itself to the demanding process of establishing a learning organization? One of the purposes of applying the theoretical concepts of organizational learning is to promote innovation.
 When the total of available resources are used in a proper manner in the operational departments of an organization, space is generated for creativity and ingenuity.
 Product of this, it is possible that the process of an organization working in team to overcome a difficulty of place to a new innovative process in order to attend the needs of the clients.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must first generate a culture of innovation, along with a shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) explains continuous enrollment as a method used to help organizations achieve a higher level of performance.
 Neurobiological data offer factual evidence for a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition, thereby reducing the field of investigation and conferring greater accuracy.
 The correlates existing between brain pathology and behavior contribute to the research of scientists.
 Since long ago it has been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in mental functions.
 Thanks to the apogee of new technologies, we have the possibility to see and investigate structures and processes that occur in the brain that never before have been seen.
 This provides us with abundant information and material to develop simulation models, which favor our understanding of mental processes.
 While it is associated much with science fiction, it is a specialty of great relevance within computer science, which deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of a machine.
 Research in the field of AI involves the development of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples of this are, among others, monitoring, planning and programming, the ability to respond to client diagnoses and queries, as well as facial, handwriting, voice recognition.
 These issues have become separate disciplines, focused on offering solutions to real-life problems.
 Artificial intelligence is now often used in the sectors of economics, medicine, engineering and the military, in the same way it was incorporated into various applications of video games and personal computers.
 Study trips constitute an important part of every classroom. It is very common for a teacher to wish to take her students to places that cannot be reached by bus.
 The solution comes from technology, through virtual excursions, where students can observe objects displayed in a museum, visit an aquarium or contemplate beautiful works of art sitting with their class.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also an excellent way to reflect on a field trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, every year, the Bennet school in North Carolina designs a Website about their trip to the state capital, and every year the Website is updated, but the previous versions are kept Online in the form of a memory album.
 Blogs can also contribute to improving the writing of students, although students usually begin their Blogging experience with a grammar and spelling that is less than perfect.
 Because students are often the readers who criticize most, the Blog writer begins to strive to improve his writing, in order to avoid criticism.
 Blogging also, as the name implies, requires students to be more comprehensive of the world around them.
 Blogs are a resource that inspire collaboration and encourage students to deepen their learning beyond the typical school day.
 The proper use of Blogs can empower students to be more Analytical and Critical, through the active response to Internet content, they can define their perspectives on the context of other's writings, in addition to establishing their perspectives on specific topics.
 Ottawa is the bilingual capital of Canada and has a variety of museums and art galleries that exhibit the history and current events of the country.
 Niagara falls are found further south and the North hosts the natural beauty of Muskoka and the extension that follows.
 All these aspects, among others, are what stand out to Ontario as intrinsically Canadian in the eyes of foreigners.
 The great areas farther north are sparsely populated, and some are wilderness, almost uninhabited.
 To make a population comparison that causes great surprise to many, there are more African-Americans living in the United States than there are Canadians.
 The location of the East African Islands is off the coast of that continent, in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is, by far, the largest and a continent in itself if we talk about wildlife.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent States or associated with France and are popular for their beaches and luxury tourist complexes.
 Islam was also brought to the lands by the Arabs and was imposed, to a large extent, in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The initial point of European influence and colonialism took place in the fifteenth century, as a result of the explorer Vasco da Gama's discovery of the route that united Europe with India.
 It borders the Sahel to the north, and the Atlantic Ocean to the south and west.
 Women: It is advised that all female visitors say they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It will also be useful to use a ring (just make sure it doesn't look too expensive).
 Women must realize that cultural differences can cause what they consider to be harassment, and that it is not uncommon for women to be followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Be rotund in rejecting men and do not hesitate to defend your position, regardless of cultural differences or not, that is not right.
 The founders of the modern city of Casablanca were the Berber fishermen during the 10th century BC and the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinides used it as a strategic port, called Anfa.
 It was destroyed and rebuilt by the Portuguese with the name Casa Branca, but in 1755 they abandoned it after the occurrence of an earthquake.
 The city was rebuilt by order of the Moroccan Sultan with the name of Daru l-Badya and the Spanish merchants who installed their businesses in that place called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring places in all of Morocco to go shopping.
 In the outskirts of the old Medina, there are plenty of places where traditional Moroccan goods are sold, such as clay pots, ceramics, leather products, water pipes and a whole range of trinkets, although everything is geared up for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist destination in the eastern Democratic Republic of the Congo, near Ruanda.
 In 2002, lava from Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma and left much of its streets under water, especially in the center of the city.
 While Goma is fairly safe, any visit to the exterior should be considered in order to take knowledge of the situation of the enfrentamientos that persist in the province of Kivu del Norte.
 In turn, the city is the base for scaling Nyiragongo volcano and its gorilla trekking excursions are among the most economical in Africa.
 To travel within Goma, you can opt for a Boda-Boda (Mototaxi). The regular fare is CDF500 (Congolese francs) for a short trip.
 This, added to the fact that it is relatively inaccessible, has given Tombuctu an image of exotic and remote land.
 Today, Tombuctu is a poor city, but it still has an airport and its reputation makes it a tourist attraction.
 In 1990, it was incorporated into the list of places of humanity in danger, product of the threat of desert sands.
 It was one of the stops on Henry Louis Gates's special, Wonders of the African world, on PBS.
 The city contrasts much with the rest of the country, as it possesses a more Arabic than African style.
 Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa and extends along the border with Mozambique in the east, Zimbabwe in the north and the Crocodile River to the south.
 The park has a surface of 19,500 km2 and is divided into 14 distinct ecozones, each of which develops a different wildlife.
 This is one of South Africa's most important attractions and is recognized as a principal icon of South Africa's National Parks.
 As in all natural reserves in South Africa, there are daily fees for conservation and access to the park.
 It's also convenient to buy a Wild Card that allows entry to selections of parks in South Africa or to all National Parks in the country.
 Hong Kong takes its name from the homonymous Island, which is the destination most part of tourists consider the main attraction.
 The deployment of buildings that delimit the horizon of Hong Kong has been compared to a light bar graph that is evidenced by the presence of the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 The best way to enjoy Hong Kong's best views is to leave the island and head to the Kowloon waterfront, located across the harbor.
 It is in the recovered lands of the northern coast of Hong Kong where its urban development is concentrated, densely.
 This is the site that British conquerors adopted as their own, so if you want to see evidence of the colonial past of this region, it's a convenient place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the world's largest coastal Mangrove forest, with a length of 80 km from the coast of Bangladesh and India.
 UNESCO has declared the Sundarbans a heritage site. The section of the forest within the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 Without this, the forests are not just Mangroves, but possess some of the last trees that remain from the once-imposing jungles that once covered the Gangetic Plains.
 The Sundarbans comprise an area of 3,850 km2 and nearly a third of its extent is covered by water or swampy areas.
 Since 1966, the Sundarbans have been a temple of wildlife and it is calculated that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and some 30,000 spotted deer in the area.
 Buses depart from the station between districts (on the other side of the river) throughout the day, though most, especially those travelling east and to Jakar (also called Bumthang), leave between 6:30 and 7:30 a.m.
 Because buses between districts frequently are crowded with passengers, it is recommended to purchase a ticket a few days in advance.
 Almost all districts have the service of Japanese Coaster buses, which are comfortable and durable.
 Sharing a taxi is a fast and comfortable way to travel to nearby places, such as Paro (150 ngultrums) and Punakha (200 ngultrums).
 The Oyapock bridge is a suspension bridge connecting Oiapoque, a Brazilian city, and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, in French Guiana.
 The two towers reach a height of 83 m, with a length of 378 m and two tracks of 3.5 m wide.
 Underneath the bridge there is a space of 15 meters and, although its construction was finished in August of 2011, it was not opened to traffic until March of 2017.
 Full functioning of the bridge is estimated for September of 2017, which is when Brazilian customs controls are expected to be finalized.
 The zone that currently constitutes the east of Paraguay was inhabited by the Guaraníes, who were the most important indigenous group in that region and who lived as Seminomadic hunters, in addition to practicing subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region hosted other aboriginal groups, for example, the Guaycurú and Payaguá, who hunted, gathered and fished as a means of subsistence.
 Paraguay, formerly known as the «Gigantic province of Indias», was born in the sixteenth century, as a product of the encounter between Spanish conquerors and indigenous natives.
 The Spanish gave inception to the stage of colonization, which extended for three centuries.
 Since Asuncion was established in 1537, Paraguay has been able to conserve much of its aboriginal idiosyncrasy and identity.
 Argentina is famous for having one of the best teams and the best players of polo at the world level.
 The tournament most important of the year takes place in December at the polo fields of Las Cañitas.
 There are also other tournaments and lower-level matches played in other parts of the year.
 You can find information about the tournaments and where to buy tickets for the polo matches on the site of the Argentine Association of Polo.
 The value of the Falkland Islands pound, the official currency of the Falkland Islands, is fixed in equivalence with the British pound.
 There is a single bank in the Islands, where you can change your money. It is opposite the FIC West store in Stanley.
 Pound Sterling is accepted anywhere within the Islands, and Stanley also accepts credit cards or U.S. dollars.
 There are chances that in the outer Islands, credit cards may not be accepted, but you could use British or U S . dollars. Ask the owners in advance to be able to define which is the accepted method of payment.
 It is practically impossible to change money outside the Malvinas, so try to do so before you leave.
 Due to Montevideo's location south of Ecuador, it is summer there when in the northern hemisphere it is winter, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics, with frequent temperatures above 30°C during the summer.
 Cold winter weather can be deceptive: while it is very rare for temperatures to be below freezing, wind and humidity interact to make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no specifically rainy or dry seasons, the amount of rain remaining almost the same throughout the year.
 While many animals in the park are accustomed to seeing people, wildlife is still wild, so do not feed or disturb it.
 According to the guidelines of the parks, you must keep at least 100 yards away from bears and wolves, and 25 yards away from the rest of the wild animals.
 Regardless of how meek they may appear, bison, Uapatíes, elks, bears, and practically all large animals can be aggressive.
 Dozens of visitors suffer injuries every year for not maintaining a proper distance. These animals are large, wild and potentially dangerous, so respect their space.
 Also, remember that odors attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid having or cooking foods that release a lot of aroma and keep the camp clean.
 The capital of Samoa, Apia, is located on the island of Upolu and has just under 40,000 inhabitants.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In 1889, the port was the scene of a nefarious naval confrontation when seven German, American, and English ships refused to leave the port.
 They sank all the ships, except for a British cruiser, killing nearly two hundred American and German individuals.
 During the war for independence that the Mau movement waged, a peaceful encounter in the city had as its outcome the assassination of the head of state, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 There are a large number of beaches, due to Auckland having two harbours, the most well-known being in three areas.
 In the North Harbour district, in the Pacific Ocean, are the beaches of North Shore, which stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 The beaches are almost all sand with safe places to swim and mostly have Pohutukawa trees that offer shade.
 In the Waitemataas harbour, Tamaki Drive beaches stretch from Mission Bay in the extravagant suburbs of St Heliers in the central region of Auckland.
 These are family beaches, at times very crowded, with numerous and varied shops available on the thing, also safe for swimming.
 Number one is the local beer most popular and it's not complex, but rather pleasant and refreshing. The other regional beer is La Manta.
 While there are a wide variety of French wines, those from New Zealand and Australia could be considered better for transport.
 The local water from the tap is completely safe to drink, but if you're concerned, you can easily find bottled water.
 Australians consider the notion of a flat white coffee to be foreign. A small black coffee is called an espresso, cappuccino is served with cream, and tea is not served with milk.
 Hot chocolate is up to Belgian standards. Fruit juices are expensive, but delicious.
 Numerous trips to the reef are made throughout the year, and there, injuries from any of these causes are rare.
 In any case, accept the advice of the authorities, respect all signs and pay special attention to safety alerts.
 Cubomedusas are located near beaches and the estuaries of rivers from October to April, north of 1770, and occasionally can be found outside of this time.
 Sharks do exist, but almost never attack people, most of them are afraid and would swim away.
 The ocean is not the place where saltwater crocodiles actively reside, their primary habitat is the estuaries of the rivers that are located north of Rockhampton.
 Reserving a room in advance of your trip gives you the peace of mind that you will have a place to sleep when you arrive at your destination.
 Travel agents usually have agreements with specific hotels, although through them it is also possible to book other types of accommodation, such as camping zones.
 Travel agents generally offer packages that include breakfast, transfers to and from the airport, and even combined packages of flights and accommodation.
 You may also keep the reservation in case you need time to think better the offer, or to obtain other documents for your destination (such as, for example, the visa).
 However, any modification or request must be made through the travel agent first, and not directly through the hotel.
 At some festivals, the majority of those attending the musical events decide to camp on the site and the majority of spectators consider it a crucial aspect of the experience.
 If you want to see the action close up, then you'll need to arrive early at the camp to get a place near the musical events.
 While musical performances may have ended, in other areas of the festival, they could continue until high hours of the morning.
 Some festivals have special camping areas, designed for families with small children.
 If you are going to cross the Baltic in winter, check where the cabin is located, as going through the ice generates a very noisy noise for the most affected.
 During the cruises to St . Petersburg, time is also spent in the city . Those disembarking are exempt from visa requirements.
 Normally, casinos make great efforts to maximize the time and money that their clients spend.
 They usually offer special promotions of food, drink and entertainment to keep guests in good spirits and within the facilities.
 Some establishments serve spirits free, although drunkenness affects judgment and all good players know the importance of keeping sober.
 Any person who intends to drive in high latitudes or in mountain passes should provide for the possibility of snow, ice or low temperatures.
 On roads with ice or snow, there is little friction, so it is not possible to drive as fast as on bare asphalt.
 During snowstorms, a lot of snow can fall that leaves him trapped in very little time.
 In addition, visibility can be reduced by snow, or by condensation or ice that forms on the windows of the automobile.
 In many countries, on the other hand, ice and snow conditions are normal and traffic flows almost without any interruption throughout the year.
 Safaris are probably the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the most memorable part for many visitors.
 The popular use of the term safari refers to overland trips to see the surprising wildlife of Africa, particularly in the savannah.
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes, will approach vehicles and standard equipment will make good vision possible.
 Lions, leopards and cheetahs can be shy, so you'll have more chance of observing them using binoculars.
 The excursion known as a walking safari (also called a Bushwalk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Hike, Bush-Hike, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-Walk, Bush-
 The Paralympic Games will take place between August 24 and September 5, 2021. A number of events will be held in other parts of Japan.
 Host of the 1964 event, Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two summer Olympic games.
 If you reserved your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the announcement of the postponement, complications may arise.
 There are different types of travel cancellation policies, but since the end of March, the coverage of most of these policies based on the Coronavirus does not extend until July of 2020, which is for when the Olympic games are scheduled to take place.
 It is expected that most events will cost between JPY 2,500 and JPY 130,000, and that common passes will cost JPY 7,000.
 Planing the clothes when they are still wet can help drying them. Many hotels have an iron and a board for travelers to use even if one is not in the room.
 If you do not have a flat iron, or if you do not want to use a flat iron, you can try using a hair dryer, if it is available.
 Be sure not to let the cloth get too hot, as it could shrink or, in extreme cases, burn.
 Different methods are known to purify water, some attacking more effectively certain concrete threats.
 In some, places it is enough to boil water for a minute, in others, several more are necessary.
 Not all filters have the same effectiveness and, if this worries you, you should consider buying bottled water with a seal from a certified company.
 It may happen that travelers encounter plagues of animals of which they have no knowledge in the regions of where they come from.
 Pests are capable of ruining food, causing irritation or, in more serious cases, causing allergic reactions, spreading poison or transmitting infections.
 Infectious diseases, by themselves, or dangerous animals, which can injure or kill individuals through the use of their force, are not usually included in the category of pests.
 Free trade offers an opportunity to purchase, in certain places, products free of taxes and duties.
 Travelers who visit countries with a high tax burden can, at times, save a significant amount of money, particularly on goods such as spirits and tobacco.
 On the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Autopista, the stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont is the most challenging and frequently traverses remote and solitary terrain.
 If you do not usually drive on rural roads, stay alert: there are many steep hills, narrow lanes, and sharp curves.
 The established speed limits are notoriously lower than in the previous and following sections, generally from 35 to 40 mph, and their strict compliance is even more important than in any other section.
 Nevertheless, curiously, the cell phone signal is much better here than in many other sections of the road like Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastries are of good quality and, in Bavaria, pastries are quite savory and varied, similar to those prepared in Austria, their neighbor to the south.
 Fruit pastries are common, with apples cooked inside throughout the year and cherries and plums appearing in the summer.
 Many of the German products that are baked also have almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts. In general, the popular pastries make an excellent combination with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you have a hankering for small but tasty pastries, try the Berliner, also called Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 Curry is a recipe based on herbs and spices and served with meat or vegetables.
 We can find curry dry and wet, depending on the volume of liquid.
 In the villages of the northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is used in curry. In the south of India and in other coastal sectors of the subcontinent, it is customary to consume coconut milk.
 With 17,000 Islands to choose from, Indonesian cuisine is a generic expression that encompasses a great variety of regional cuisines that are distributed throughout the country.
 No obstante, employed without any other qualifying term, the term tends to refer to the gastronomy originating in the central and eastern regions of the main island of Java.
 Javanese cuisine, currently available throughout the archipelago, offers a variety of dishes seasoned with simple condiments, with predominance of the Javanese's predilection for cacahuates, chiles, sugar, especially Javanese coconut sugar, and various aromatic spices.
 If you find yourself resetting the clock in your sleep, it can be placed on the other side of the room, forcing you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 While providing greater stability to the rider, they can present safety problems, as it is possible for the rider's feet to become trapped in them.
 If a rider is thrown from the horse, but a foot remains stuck in the stirrup, he can be dragged if the animal runs away.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel that has a flat and fairly narrow sole.
 In addition, there are saddles, especially English saddles, with safety bars that allow the stirrup leather to break away from its structure if a rider who is thrown out pulls back.
 The Valley of Cochamó is Chile's most popular climbing destination and is known as Yosemite of South America, with a variety of extensive granite walls and cliffs.
 The summits also offer impactful views from the peaks. Climbers from all corners of the globe constantly delineate new paths between their walls of infinite potential.
 Sports that involve descending, such as skiing and snowboarding, are popular disciplines that consist of sliding on skis or a board fixed to the feet, over a snowy terrain.
 Skiing is a major travel activity with many devotees, sometimes called ski lovers, who organize their holidays completely based on skiing at a specific site.
 The idea of skiing is very ancient, as there are rock paintings that represent skiers and that date back to around 5,000 BC.
 As a discipline, alpine skiing dates from no later than the seventeenth century, when Norwegians inaugurated the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Backpacker in skiing: also known as rural zone skiing, of travesía or senderismo in skiing.
 While vinculan, in general, do not involve practicing the sport of alpine skiing or mountaineering developed in steep slopes and with much more rigid ski and footwear.
 Imagine the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 In satisfactory conditions, you will be able to cover a little more distance than if you were walking, but very rarely will you reach the speed of cross-country skiing without a heavy pack on groomed trails.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries. Under normal circumstances, traveling through several countries would mean having to manage visa applications and passport controls several times.
 Schengen space functions as a single country in this sense.
 Generally, if you move within this region, you can cross borders without passing through another passport control post.
 In the same way, having a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for permits to each of the Member States of this space separately, which saves you time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal criterion that determines when a manufactured good can be considered an antique. Some tax agencies have established that objects more than 100 years old are antiques.
 The definition varies geographically, where the age limit could be more narrowly defined in places like North America than in Europe.
 It may happen that products elaborated in a handicraft way are catalogued as antiques, even though they are newer than similar characteristics goods manufactured in series.
 Reindeer herding constitutes a fundamental means of livelihood among the Laplanders, and the culture related to that commercial activity is important to many who are dedicated to other professions.
 Even traditionally, however, not all Laplanders have been dedicated to reindeer herding on a large scale, but have lived from fishing, hunting and other similar activities, using reindeer mainly as draught animals.
 Today, many Laplanders work in modern commercial activities. Tourism represents a major income in Lapland, the Sámi region.
 While it is used extensively, especially among those who are not Romani, the term Gypsy is often given a pejorative connotation, as it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate appraisals of Romani.
 If your destination country is subject to a travel alert, it could affect your medical or cancellation insurance.
 It's possible that they want to consult the recommendations of other governments, but they're designed for their own citizens.
 For example, a North American visitor in the Middle East might face situations distinct from those of a European or an Arab.
 Travel warnings are just a concise summary of the political situation in another country.
 Several people verified the discovery using different hardware and software by the beginning of February and it was announced on Tuesday.
 Severe weather refers, in general, to any risky climatic phenomenon that is capable of causing damage, serious social alterations or the death of people.
 Severe climate can occur at any point on the planet and there are different types depending on geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 Hurricanes, drought, excessive rains and forest fires are types and consequences of extreme climate, as well as electrical storms, tornadoes, water mangoes or cyclones.
 Among the extreme regional and seasonal climatic phenomena we find the ventarrones, snowstorms, ice or dust storms.
 It's recommended that travelers inform themselves about any extreme weather risks in the area they're visiting, given that it can affect their travel plans.
 Anyone planning a trip to a country that could be described as a war zone should receive professional training.
 It's likely that searching for hostile zones on the Internet will lead to the address of a local company.
 Normally, a course will cover all the topics that have been treated here in much more detail and, in general, with practical experience.
 A course normally lasts between 2 and 5 days, and includes role-playing, first aid, and even training with weapons.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wild are common, but publications that deal with war zones are scarce.
 Passengers who have scheduled sex change surgery in another country should make sure they have valid documentation for the return trip.
 The position of governments regarding the possibility of issuing passports without a gender declaration (X) or updated documents in order to make the name of the person coincide with the gender with which they feel identified.
 The predisposition of foreign governments to honor these documents varies greatly.
 The inspections at security checkpoints have become more invasive since September 11.
 Transgender people who have not yet had surgery should not be expected to pass through scanners with their dignity and privacy intact.
 The return currents are the flow that recedes from the waves breaking on the shore, frequently on a reef or similar.
 Because of the submarine topography, the return flow gathers in certain zones of greater depth and there it can originate a rapid current with direction to deep waters.
 Most of the deaths occur because of the fatigue caused by trying to swim against the current, which is perhaps impossible.
 Once you escape the current, swimming back will not be more complex than usual.
 Make the attempt to reach some place where you cannot reach it again or, if you have the skills and someone has seen it, it might be convenient to wait for someone to rescue it.
 The impact of returning home occurs before the cultural one (there is no period of honeymoon happiness), it takes longer to go and can be more difficult.
 Travelers who find it easy to adapt to a new culture sometimes have many difficulties in returning to their native culture.
 When he returns to his home after residing in a foreign country, he will have adapted himself to that new culture and will have lost part of the habits of his native culture.
 When you traveled abroad the first time, people probably were patient and understanding, knowing that travelers need to adapt to a new country.
 People may not foresee that tolerance and understanding are also necessary for travelers returning to their homes.
 The light show and the pyramid sound are one of the most interesting things for children in the area.
 In the darkness, you can see the pyramids and contemplate them in silence before the show begins.
 Generally, you will hear the sound of tourists and vendors at all times. The history of sound and light is akin to a book of tales.
 The Sphinx appears as a backdrop and narrator of a long history.
 The scenes are projected onto the pyramids and all are illuminated.
 The discovery of the South Shetland Islands occurred in 1819 and several nations claim them, with the largest number of bases, reaching sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago is 120 km north of the peninsular territory, the largest island is Rey Jorge, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Others include Livingston Island and Deception, where there is a spectacular natural harbor formed by the caldera inundated by a volcano that remains active.
 Ellsworth land, whose limits are defined by the Bellingshausen sea, is a region located south of the peninsula.
 In this place, the mountains of the Peninsula mix with the Meseta and then resurge to form the Cordillera of 360 km of the Ellsworth mountains, Fractioned in two by the glacier Minnesota.
 In the northern sector, Cordillera Sentinel, are the highest peaks of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, with a peak at 4,892 metres on Mount Vinson.
 In remote sites where cell phone coverage is not available, a satellite device could be their only option.
 A satellite phone cannot be equated to a mobile phone, because to make a call, one must be outdoors and have a clear line of sight to the satellite.
 The service is commonly used in water transport, including recreational boating, as well as for expeditions requiring remote data and voice.
 You can consult with your local telephone service provider for more information on how to adhere to this service.
 Combining travel and learning has become a very popular option among those planning to take a year off.
 This is very popular among high school graduates, as it allows them to take a year off before college without putting their education at risk.
 In many cases, enrolling in a study abroad program for a year can, in fact, increase the chances of access to higher education once one returns to the home country.
 Normally, a fee will be charged to enroll in these educational programs.
 Finland is an excellent destination for sailing: the land of a thousand lakes also has thousands of islands, both in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 No yacht is always required in the archipelagos and lakes.
 While the coastal archipelagos and the larger lakes are ample enough for any yacht, smaller craft or even a kayak provide a different experience.
 Sailing is a recreational activity at national level in Finland, with a boat for every seven or eight inhabitants.
 Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but, taking that out, it's quite unique (e.g., in the Netherlands the ratio is one in forty).
 Most exclusive cruises that are made through the Baltic Sea include a long-duration stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you have the possibility of making a visit to the historic city for a few days during your return trip, sleeping on the boat overnight.
 If you only disembark during excursions on board, no visa is necessary.
 In the brochures of some cruise lines, Berlin, Germany appears, yet as can be observed in the map above, the city is not near the sea and its visit is not included in the cruise price.
 Flying can generate fear in people of any age and place, in particular if they have never passed through the experience or if they have lived some traumatic situation.
 No shame should be felt for it: in nothing does it differ from other types of personal fears and disagreements that afflict so many others.
 For some, understanding a little bit about how airplanes work and what happens during a flight can help to ease a fear that derives from a lack of knowledge or a sense of not having control.
 The companies that pay very well for fast deliveries, frequently, time is very important when it comes to commercial documents, merchandise or urgent repairs.
 The big companies had their own planes on some routes, but there was a problem for the smaller companies and other routes.
 If they made an air freight shipment, in some routes it may have taken days to unload and clear customs.
 The only option for making it go faster was to send it as checked baggage. The airline's regulations prohibit transporting baggage without a passenger, and that's where you come in.
 The obvious way to travel first class or in the executive class of an airplane is to spend a fortune for that privilege (or, better yet, have your company pay for you).
 But this comes at a price: in general, you can end up paying up to four times more for the economy fare in business class and up to eleven times more for first class.
 Generally, it's a waste of time to look for discounts on first or business class seats on direct flights.
 If you find yourself resetting the clock in your sleep, it can be placed on the other side of the room, forcing you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 The capital of Moldavia is Chişinău. Its regional language is Romanian, although Russian is also very widely spoken.
 Moldavia is a Republic composed of many ethnicities, among which conflicts of that kind have arisen.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the formation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria, east of Moldavia, which has its own government and currency, but which no UN member state recognizes.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, economic ties between the two parts of Moldavia have been reestablished.
 Orthodox Christianity is the majority religion in Moldavia.
 Esmirna is the third most important city in Turkey, with approximately 3.7 million inhabitants, the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transportation hub.
 Once the ancient city of Esmirna, it is now a modern, evolved, and crowded commercial metropolis, established around a large bay and surrounded by mountains.
 Both the extensive boulevards and the vanguard shopping centers are sprinkled with traditional red-tiled roofs, from the market of the eighteenth century and the ancient mosques and churches.
 The village of Haldarsvik has excursions to the nearby island of Eysturoy and has an atypical church with an octagonal shape.
 In the cemetery, there are interesting marble sculptures of doves on some tombs.
 It is worth half an hour to walk through the fascinating town.
 Toward the north and within easy reach is the romantic and alucinating city of Sintra, which gained popularity among foreigners after a vivid tale of its splendor was made by Lord Byron.
 In Scotturb, bus 403 runs regularly to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 You should also visit, to the north, the great Santuario de Nuestra Señora de Fátima, which is a site where there were apparitions of the Virgin Mary, famous throughout the world.
 No, it's not a cemetery, but basically, you're visiting a place that served as a graveyard and also is a site of practically invaluable significance to a significant part of the world's population.
 Even more, there are many men and women alive today who survived their stay in this place and many more who had loved ones who were murdered or worked there until their death, both Jewish and non-Jewish.
 Give the place all the dignity, solemnity, and respect it deserves.
 Do not ruin the place by making marks or graffiti on the structures.
 Catalan and Spanish are the official languages of Barcelona. Approximately half of its people prefer to speak Catalan, the vast majority understand it, and practically all know Spanish.
 Nevertheless, because Catalan is legally the first language of official character, most of the signs are written only in that language.
 Spanish is also used a lot in public transportation and other buildings.
 While the usual announcements in the Metro are only in Catalan, the unscheduled interruptions are made in a great variety of languages through an automatic program in a great variety of languages, among them Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being egocentric, rude, and arrogant.
 Although it's usually only an inaccurate stereotype, the best way to enjoy Paris is to behave as well as possible, like a well-bred person.
 A few courteous gestures on your part will quickly dispel the apparent brusque manners of the Parisians.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is very wooded, mainly with beeches, firs and pines, and presents a vegetation between alpine and Mediterranean.
 It possesses a wide and extraordinary range of vegetal communities, thanks to the variety of microclimates, soils and altitude levels.
 This region is also home to a wide variety of animal and bird species.
 The European bear, the wolf, the eagle, the buzzard, the lynx, the wild cat, and the urogallo, are some of the exotic animals, among other numerous ordinary creatures, that can be found in the place.
 During visits to monasteries, women must wear skirts that cover the knees and cannot wear shoulders uncovered.
 While almost all monasteries give coats to women who arrive unprepared, if you bring yours, especially if it has bright colors, the monk or nun will smile at you at the entrance.
 Following the same line, men are required to wear pants that cover the knees.
 This can also be taken from the clothes available when you enter, but that clothing is not washed after each person wears it, so it might not feel comfortable using these skirts.
 Majorca's cuisine, like that of other similar regions of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork, and uses olive oil in all its recipes.
 Pa amb Oli is a popular and simple meal, typical especially in summer, and is a bread with olive oil, tomato and any other ingredient such as cheese or tuna, among others.
 All nouns, as well as the vocabulary Sie to mean you, always carry their initial letter in upper case, even if they are in the middle of the sentence.
 It's a key method for differentiating between certain verbs and objects.
 It can also be said that it simplifies reading, although its writing is somewhat complex, since it is necessary to find out if a verb or adjective is used in a sustantivated form.
 Pronouncing Italian is relatively simple, given that most of its words sound the same as they are written.
 C and G are the letters with which you should be most attentive, since they are pronounced differently depending on the vowel that follows them.
 As a result, the process of an organization working together to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process to serve the customer's need.
 Persian has a relatively simple and largely regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar manual will help you learn a lot about Persian grammar rules and achieve a better understanding of Persian phrases.
 It is not necessary to clarify that if one dominates any Romance language, it will be easier to learn Portuguese.
 Nevertheless, those who speak some Spanish may arrive at the hurried conclusion that Portuguese is quite similar and that it is unnecessary to study it individually.
 In the present day, generally, pre-modern observatories have become obsolete and remain functioning as museums or educational destinations.
 Since, in their heyday, light pollution was not a problem of great magnitude as it is today, it is frequent to find them in cities or on campuses, being of easier access than those that are constructed in modern times.
 Most of the current research telescopes consist of immense structures installed in remote areas with propitious atmospheric conditions.
 The contemplation of cherry blossoms, called hanami, is traditional in Japan since the eighth century.
 The concept came from China, where the flower of the Plum tree was the most appreciated.
 It was the Emperor of Japan who organized the first celebrations of the cherry blossom, only for him and other members of the Imperial Court.
 Plants look better when they're in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to just pull up a specimen.
 If you collect specimens during a visit to a formally organised garden, you will be asked to leave, without debate.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to be and very easy to navigate, and you can buy almost any product from the moment you arrive.
 But due to its location in the high tropics, a few degrees north of the equator, you'll always have to deal with heat and, when the sky is clear, with strong sun, which happens less frequently.
 Besides, some buses go to Hebron, to the North, which is the site where, according to the Bible, the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, Jacob and their wives were buried.
 He must verify that the bus he intends to board is going to Hebron and not only to Kyriat Arba, which is a Jewish neighborhood near that place.
 Inland waterways can be a good topic for vacations.
 For example, visit castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, take a cruise to interesting destinations on the Danube, or tour the Erie Canal by boat.
 They also delineate routes for popular hiking and biking trails.
 For the Christian religion, Christmas is one of its most important festivities, in which the birth of Jesus Christ is celebrated.
 There are numerous traditions related to this festival that have been incorporated also by non-believers from both Christian and Non-Christian countries around the globe.
 It is traditional to spend Easter night on watch in some exposed place to contemplate the rising of the sun.
 There are, of course, Christian theological explanations of this tradition, but it may well be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 The more traditional churches usually offer a Paschal Vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend and, generally, congregations begin the celebrations for the resurrection of Christ just after midnight.
 All animals that originally came to the Islands came here by swimming, flying, or floating.
 Due to their being very far away from the mainland, mammals could not reach them, which made the giant tortoise the main grazing creature in the Galapagos.
 Many mammal species have been introduced to Galapagos since man arrived in the archipelago, such as caprine, equine and bovine, or rodents, dogs and cats.
 If you travel to the Arctic or Antarctic regions in winter, you will experience the polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 Given that the sky will remain dark almost all day, it's a great opportunity to contemplate the Aurora Borealis.
 Thanks to the sparse population that resides in those regions and that, as a result, there are not usually light pollution problems, you will also be able to enjoy the stars.
 In Japan, the labor culture has a more verticalist and formal structure than Westerners are probably used to.
 The typical clothing of the business world is suits and the co-workers are called by their last names or by their job titles.
 Harmony in the workplace is fundamental, where group efforts are emphasized over focusing on individual praise.
 Workers frequently need approval from their superiors to make decisions and are expected to obey instructions without questioning.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.24975426701946474, 'precisions': [0.5726789855614574, 0.311406578026592, 0.18842573856738162, 0.11579036205586969], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.0814287447918773, 'translation_length': 26734, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 55.98291774893867, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}